District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.62

Severability.

If any particular provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person of circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 762
as added Oct. 12, 1984, 98 Stat. 1975, Pub. L. 98-473, § 131(l)